Maryland, session 2026, HB0108.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
36–206.
(a) In this section, “Fund” means the Cannabis Regulation and Enforcement
Fund.
(b) There is a Cannabis Regulation and Enforcement Fund.
(c) The purpose of the Fund is to provide funds to cover the costs of:
(1) the operation of the Administration;
(2) administering and enforcing this title; [and]
– 1 –

Ch. 519 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) supporting the Social Equity Partnership Grant Program established
under § 1–323 of this article; AND
(4) SUPPORTING THE RELEASE PREPARATION PROGRAM
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–619 OF THE CORRECTIONAL SERVICES ARTICLE.
(d) The Administration shall administer the Fund.
(e) (1) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to § 7–302 of
the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(2) The State Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately, and the
Comptroller shall account for the Fund.
(f) The Fund consists of:
(1) fees distributed to the Fund under § 36–205 of this subtitle;
(2) revenue distributed to the Fund under § 2–1302.2 of the Tax – General
Article;
(3) interest earnings of the Fund; and
(4) any other money from any other source accepted for the benefit of the
Fund, in accordance with any conditions adopted by the Commission for the acceptance of
donations or gifts to the Fund.
(g) The Fund may be used for:
(1) carrying out this title [and];
(2) supporting the Social Equity Partnership Grant Program established
under § 1–323 of this article; AND
(3) SUPPORTING THE RELEASE PREPARATION PROGRAM
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–619 OF THE CORRECTIONAL SERVICES ARTICLE.
(h) (1) The State Treasurer shall invest the money of the Fund in the same
manner as other State money may be invested.
(2) Any interest earnings of the Fund shall be credited to the Fund.
(i) The Fund is subject to audit by the Office of Legislative Audits as provided for
in § 2–1220 of the State Government Article.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 519
(j) (1) On or before March 15 each year, the Administration shall publish on
its website a detailed report on revenue distributed to and expenditures from the Fund.
(2) The report shall also be submitted to the General Assembly in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article.
Article – Correctional Services
9–619.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PROGRAM” MEANS THE RELEASE PREPARATION
VOLUNTEER SERVICES PROGRAM.
(B) THERE IS A RELEASE PREPARATION VOLUNTEER SERVICES PROGRAM
IN THE DIVISION OF CORRECTION.
(C) (1) THE DIVISION OF CORRECTION SHALL ESTABLISH A PROTOCOL
FOR REGISTERING VOLUNTEERS, INCLUDING FORMERLY INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUALS AND ORGANIZATIONS LED BY FORMERLY INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUALS, IN THE PROGRAM TO HAVE ACCESS TO STATE CORRECTIONAL
FACILITIES FOR THE PURPOSE OF ASSISTING INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS WITH
RELEASE PREPARATION.
(2) THE DIVISION OF CORRECTION SHALL SUBMIT THE PROTOCOL
ESTABLISHED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION TO THE OFFICE OF THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL FOR APPROVAL.
(D) THE PROTOCOL ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS
SECTION SHALL REQUIRE:
(1) THE DIVISION OF CORRECTION TO MAINTAIN A RECORD OF
VOLUNTEERS REGISTERED IN THE PROGRAM;
(2) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, THE
REGISTRATION OF FORMERLY INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS VOLUNTEERS IN THE
PROGRAM TO BE MADE AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC; AND
(2) (3) A FORMERLY INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL VOLUNTEER IN
THE PROGRAM TO PROVIDE TO THE DIVISION OF CORRECTION A WRITTEN
SCHEDULE DESCRIBING WHEN THE INDIVIDUAL VOLUNTEER INTENDS TO ACCESS A
STATE CORRECTIONAL FACILITY.
(E) A VOLUNTEER IN THE PROGRAM:
– 3 –

Ch. 519 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) HAS THE RIGHT TO ELECT WHETHER THE VOLUNTEER’S NAME IS
MADE AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC; AND
(2) MUST CONSENT IN WRITING IF THE VOLUNTEER ELECTS THE
DISCLOSURE OF THE VOLUNTEER’S NAME TO THE PUBLIC.
(E) (F) THE DIVISION OF CORRECTION MAY NOT DENY A SCHEDULE
PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (D)(2) (D)(3) OF THIS SECTION UNLESS THE
SCHEDULE INTERFERES WITH THE NORMAL FUNCTION OF THE STATE
CORRECTIONAL FACILITY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 4 –